Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1073
Public policy declaration.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the State of Nebraska to protect and foster the health, prosperity, and general welfare of its people by preserving and protecting the plant industry. Because of the importance of the plant industry to the welfare and economy of the state and the damage which can result from the uncontrolled proliferation of plant pests, there is a need to impose standards and restrictions on the movement and care of plants within the state. The Department of Agriculture shall be charged with administering and enforcing such standards and restrictions through the Plant Protection and Plant Pest Act.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 2.